Massachusetts, session 194th, H956.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. As used in this act, the following words shall, unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise, have the following meanings:—
“Appurtenant structure”, any equipment, systems, parts and structures that are attached to
or pertinent to the design, operation or function of assets.
“Asset”, any common flood prevention structure and equipment that is used to control
flows of water or whose function is necessary for the proper operation of structures used to
control flows of water including, but not limited to, dams, tide gates, flood gates, solar panels
and floats.
“Cutler bridge” or “Cutler highway bridge”, the 107 Cutler highway vehicular bridge,
Massachusetts Department of Transportation bridge number R05061, and all equipment and
of 6

assets attached to the bridge that are pertinent to highway and bridge operations, located in the
city of Revere. This shall include, but is not limited to, 8 box culverts structurally built into the
Cutler highway vehicular bridge, and trash racks affixed to the upstream side of the Cutler
highway vehicular bridge, with the purposes of protecting the 8 box culverts from large debris,
sediment and other build up.
“Emergency maintenance” or “emergency repairs”, any immediate repairs or
maintenance work necessary to address unforeseen issues that prevent the proper operation and
function of an asset.
“Flood gate”, a type of gate classified as a common flood prevention structure. When
operating as designed, the gate can be opened or closed to control the flow of water for Town
Line brook or Linden brook.
“Repair”, any project or construction work carried forth with the purpose of returning
dysfunctional assets and appurtenant structures to their intended and fully operational state.
Repairs shall not disable or disrupt the operations of the assets and appurtenant structures for
more than 30 days.
“Reconstruction”, any projects or construction work that shall disable or disrupt the
operations of an asset or appurtenant structure for more than 30 days. Reconstruction shall also
be any work or construction work that would require demolishing or replacement of over 50 per
cent of the existing asset or appurtenant structure.
“Routine maintenance”, any project or inspection work carried forth while an asset or
appurtenant structure is operating as intended or reasonably adequately in which no major
of 6

functions are disabled or disrupted, with the purpose of maintaining the intended functions of
and ensuring the proper operation of an asset or appurtenant structure.
“Tide gate”, a type of gate classified for the purposes of this act as a common flood
prevention structure. When operating as designed, the gate allows water to flow freely when the
tide sets in 1 direction but closes automatically and prevents the water from flowing in the
opposite direction.
SECTION 2. Any assets, appurtenant structures or other structures used to control the
flow of water at, into or out of the Town Line brook or Linden brook shall be under the care,
custody, and control of the Department of Conservation and Recreation. This shall include, but is
not limited to, the tide gates attached to the 107 Cutler highway vehicular bridge, located in the
city of Revere. This shall not include the 8 box culverts structurally built into the Cutler highway
vehicular bridge and trash racks affixed to the upstream side of the Cutler highway vehicular
bridge, with the purposes of protecting the 8 box culverts from large debris, sediment, and other
build up. The department shall be responsible for the inspections, emergency maintenance,
routine maintenance, reconstruction and repairs to the assets and appurtenant structures pursuant
to section 4.
SECTION 3. The Cutler highway bridge, located in the city of Revere, shall be under the
care, custody, and control of the Massachusetts Department of Transportation. For the purposes
of this act, all equipment, and attachments necessary for the operation of the Cutler highway
bridge including, but not limited to, the 8 box culverts structurally built into the Cutler highway
vehicular bridge, and trash racks affixed to the upstream side of the Cutler highway vehicular
bridge shall be under the care, custody and control of the Massachusetts Department of
of 6

Transportation. The Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall be responsible for the
inspections, emergency maintenance, routine maintenance, reconstruction and repairs to the
assets and appurtenant structures pursuant to section 5.
SECTION 4. (a) The Department of Conservation and Recreation shall, from time to time
but at least twice annually, conduct routine maintenance and inspections of the assets and
appurtenant structures identified in section 2 to identify any damage, wear and tear or loss of
functionality of said structures.
(b) The Department of Conservation and Recreation shall be responsible for and shall
conduct any routine maintenance on the assets and appurtenant structures identified in section 2,
as required, to ensure that they are functioning properly.
(c) The Department of Conservation and Recreation shall be responsible for and shall
conduct any repairs, reconstruction and emergency repairs on the structures identified in section
2, as required, to ensure that they are functioning properly.
SECTION 5. (a) The Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall, from time to
time but at least twice annually, conduct routine maintenance and inspections of the Cutler
bridge and structures identified in section 3 to identify any damage, wear and tear or loss of
functionality of said structures.
(b) The Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall be responsible for and shall
conduct any routine maintenance on the Cutler bridge and structures identified in section 3, as
required, to ensure that they are functioning properly.
of 6

(c) The Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall be responsible for and shall
conduct any repairs, reconstruction and emergency repairs on the Cutler bridge and structures
identified in section 3, as required, to ensure that they are functioning properly.
SECTION 6. (a) Subject to existing permitting requirements, the Massachusetts
Department of Transportation shall permit Department of Conservation and Recreation personnel
to pass on and over the Cutler bridge and other property owned by Massachusetts Department of
Transportation as reasonably necessary to access the assets and appurtenant structures identified
in section 2 to carry out the requirements of this act.
(b) The Department of Conservation and Recreation shall permit elected officials and
employees of the cities of Malden, Revere and Everett to observe the inspections, routine
maintenance, repairs, reconstruction and emergency repairs conducted pursuant to section 4.
SECTION 7. (a) The Department of Conservation and Recreation shall report the results
of any inspection conducted pursuant to subsection (a) of section 4 to the Massachusetts
Department of Transportation, the mayor and city council president of the city of Malden, the
mayor and city council president of the city of Revere and the mayor and city council president
of the city of Everett within 90 days of the inspection.
(b) The Department of Conservation and Recreation shall notify the mayor and city
council president of the city of Malden, the mayor and city council president of the city of
Revere and the mayor and city council president of the city of Everett in writing of any
maintenance pursuant to subsection (b) of section 4 and any repairs pursuant to subsection (c) of
section 4.
of 6

SECTION 8. The costs of carrying out the routine maintenance, repairs, reconstructions,
inspections and emergency repairs provided for in this act shall be borne by the state agency
upon which care, custody and control rests.
of 6